bulgarian.affix
flag *T:
    Я        >      -Я,-
    Я        >      -Я,Е
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЙКИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕМ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩОТО
    Я        >      -Я,Й
    Я        >      -Я,ЙТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,Л
    Я        >      -Я,ЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЛОТО
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,Я
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЙ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЙКИ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЙТЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЛ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЛА
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЛАТА
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЛИ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЛИТЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЛИЯ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЛИЯТ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЛО
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЛОТО
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯМЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯН
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯНА
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯНАТА
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯНИ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯНИТЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯНИЯ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯНИЯТ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯНО
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯНОТО
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯТ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯТЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯХ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯХА
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯХМЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯХТЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯШ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯШЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЩ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЩА
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЩАТА
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЩИ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЩИТЕ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЩИЯ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЩИЯТ
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЩО
    Я М      >      -ЯМ,ЯЩОТО
    Я        >      -Я,Т
    Я        >      -Я,ТА
    Я        >      -Я,ТАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ТИ
    Я        >      -Я,ТИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ТИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ТИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ТО
    Я        >      -Я,ТОТО
    Я        >      -Я,Х
    Я        >      -Я,ХА
    Я        >      -Я,ХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТ

flag *U:
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДАТ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕЙКИ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕЛИ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕЛИТЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕМ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕН
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕНА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕНАТА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕНИ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕНИТЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕНИЯ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕНИЯТ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕНО
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕНОТО
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕТЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕШ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЕШЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДИ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДОХ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДОХА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДОХМЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДОХТЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЛ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЛА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЛАТА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЛИЯ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЛИЯТ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЛО
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЛОТО
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯХ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯХА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯХМЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯХТЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЩ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЩА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЩАТА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЩИ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЩИТЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЩИЯ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЩИЯТ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЩО
    Д А      >      -ДА,ДЯЩОТО
    Д А      >      -ДА,Л
    Д А      >      -ДА,ЛА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ЛАТА
    Д А      >      -ДА,ЛИ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ЛИТЕ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ЛИЯ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ЛИЯТ
    Д А      >      -ДА,ЛО
    Д А      >      -ДА,ЛОТО
    Т А      >      -ТА,Л
    Т А      >      -ТА,ЛА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ЛАТА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ЛИ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ЛИТЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ЛИЯ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ЛИЯТ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ЛО
    Т А      >      -ТА,ЛОТО
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТАТ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕЙКИ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕЛИ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕЛИТЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕМ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕН
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕНА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕНАТА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕНИ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕНИТЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕНИЯ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕНИЯТ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕНО
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕНОТО
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕТЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕШ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЕШЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТИ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТОХ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТОХА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТОХМЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТОХТЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЛ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЛА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЛАТА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЛИЯ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЛИЯТ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЛО
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЛОТО
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯХ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯХА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯХМЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯХТЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЩ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЩА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЩАТА
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЩИ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЩИТЕ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЩИЯ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЩИЯТ
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЩО
    Т А      >      -ТА,ТЯЩОТО
    Я        >      -Я,-
    Я        >      -Я,Е
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЙКИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕМ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕШЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩО
    Я        >      -Я,ЕЩОТО
    Я        >      -Я,Й
    Я        >      -Я,ЙТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,Л
    Я        >      -Я,ЛА
    Я        >      -Я,ЛАТА
    Я        >      -Я,ЛИ
    Я        >      -Я,ЛИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЛИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,ЛИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,ЛО
    Я        >      -Я,ЛОТО
    Я        >      -Я,Н
    Я        >      -Я,НА
    Я        >      -Я,НАТА
    Я        >      -Я,НИ
    Я        >      -Я,НИТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,НИЯ
    Я        >      -Я,НИЯТ
    Я        >      -Я,НО
    Я        >      -Я,НОТО
    Я        >      -Я,Х
    Я        >      -Я,ХА
    Я        >      -Я,ХМЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ХТЕ
    Я        >      -Я,ЯТ
